Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5718.02
Electronic smoking device retail outlet, defined; persons allowed to enter; employees; age restrictions.

(1) Electronic smoking device retail outlet means a store that:

(a) Is licensed as provided under sections 28-1421 and 28-1422;

(b) Sells electronic smoking devices and products directly related to electronic smoking devices;

(c) Does not sell alcohol or gasoline;

(d) Derives no more than twenty percent of its revenue from the sale of food and food ingredients as defined in section 77-2704.24; and

(e) Prohibits persons under twenty-one years of age from entering the store in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) Prior to January 1, 2022, an electronic smoking device retail outlet shall not allow a person under twenty-one years of age to enter the store but may allow an employee who is under twenty-one years of age to work in the store.

(b) On and after January 1, 2022, an electronic smoking device retail outlet shall not allow a person under twenty-one years of age to enter the store and shall not allow an employee who is under twenty-one years of age to work in the store.

Laws 2020, LB840, § 5.